Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 624, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 427, O.S.L. 2025 (36 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 624), is amended to read as follows:


Section 624. A. Every insurance company, copartnership,


insurance association, interinsurance exchange, person, insurer,


nonprofit hospital service and medical indemnity corporation, or


health maintenance organization doing business in this state in the


execution or exchange of contracts of insurance, indemnity or health


maintenance services, or as an insurance company of any nature or


character whatsoever, hereinafter referred to in this article as an


insurance company or company, shall annually, on or before the first

Req. No. 2461 Page 1


day of March, report under oath of the president or secretary or


other chief officer of such company to the Insurance Commissioner


the total amount of direct written premiums, membership,


application, policy and/or registration fees charged during the


preceding calendar year, or since the last return of such direct


written premiums, membership, application, policy and/or


registration fees was made by such company, from insurance of every


kind upon persons or on the lives of persons resident in this state,


or upon real and personal property located within this state, and/or


upon any other risks insured within this state; provided, that with


respect to the tax payable annually, considerations received for


annuity contracts and payments received by a health maintenance


organization from the Secretary of Health and Human Services


pursuant to a contract issued under the provisions of 42 U.S.C.,


Section 1395mm(g) shall no longer be deemed to be premiums for


insurance and shall no longer be subject to the tax imposed by this


section. Every such company shall, at the same time, pay to the


Insurance Commissioner:


1. An annual license fee as prescribed by Section 321 of this


title; and


2. An annual tax on all of the direct written premiums after


all returned premiums are deducted, and on all membership,


application, policy and/or registration fees, installment and/or


finance fees or charges collected thereby, for the privileges of

Req. No. 2461 Page 2


having written, continued and/or serviced insurance on lives,


property and/or other risks in this state and of having made and


serviced investments therein during the then expiring license year


except premiums or fees paid by any county, city, town or school


district funds or by their duly constituted authorities performing a


public service organized pursuant to Sections 1001 through 1008 of


Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or Sections 176 through 180.4 of


Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Provided, no deduction shall be


made from premiums for dividends paid to policyholders. Except as


set forth in this paragraph, the rate of taxation for all entities


subject to the tax shall be two and twenty-five one-hundredths


percent (2.25%), until June 30, 2026, and one and ninety-six one-


hundredths percent (1.96%), beginning July 1, 2026. If any


insurance company or other entity liable for the taxes levied


pursuant to the provisions of this section fails to remit such taxes


in a timely manner, it shall remain liable therefor together with


interest thereon at an annual rate equal to the average United


States Treasury Bill rate of the preceding calendar year as


certified by the State Treasurer on the first regular business day


in January of each year, plus four percentage points.


a. The rate of taxation for all life insurance policies


insuring the life of an employee or director for the


benefit of the employer or a trust sponsored by the


employer, which is purchased by the employer or trust

Req. No. 2461 Page 3


sponsored by the employer for the benefit of its


employees, shall be computed for each policy at the


rate of:


(1) until June 30, 2026, two and twenty-five one-


hundredths percent (2.25%) of policy year premium


up to One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00),


and


(2) beginning July 1, 2026, one and ninety-six one-


hundredths percent (1.96%) of policy year premium


up to One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00),


and


(3) one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%) of policy


year premium exceeding One Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($100,000.00).


b. Premiums on which taxes are paid under division (2)


(3) of subparagraph a of this paragraph are not


subject to Section 628 of this title. The


Commissioner shall promulgate rules regarding the sale


of life insurance policies subject to division (2) (3)


of subparagraph a of this paragraph.


c. Proceeds from the premium tax collected under this


paragraph from contracted entities under the Ensuring


Access to Medicaid Act shall be deposited in the


Medicaid Health Improvement Revolving Fund created in

Req. No. 2461 Page 4


Section 1010.8A of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the


contrary, the premium taxes to be deposited in the


Medicaid Health Improvement Revolving Fund for the


calendar year ending December 31, 2024, and for each


calendar year thereafter, shall not be subject to the


apportionments provided in Section 312.1 of this


title.


B. For all insurance companies or other entities taxed pursuant


to this section, the annual license fee and tax and all required


membership, application, policy, registration, and agent appointment


fees shall be in lieu of all other state taxes or fees, except those


taxes and fees provided for in the Oklahoma Insurance Code, and the


taxes and fees of any subdivision or municipality of the state,


except ad valorem taxes and the tax required to be paid pursuant to


Section 50001 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes. Provided, such


license fee, tax and membership, application, policy, registration,


and appointment fees shall be in lieu of any and all ad valorem


taxes levied on intangible personal property. Any company, except


health maintenance organizations, failing to make such returns and


payments promptly and correctly shall forfeit and pay to the


Insurance Commissioner, in addition to the amount of the taxes and


fees and interest, the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or an


amount equal to one percent (1%) of the unpaid amount, whichever is

Req. No. 2461 Page 5


greater; and the company so failing or neglecting for sixty (60)


days shall thereafter be debarred from transacting any business of


insurance in this state until the taxes, fees and penalties are


fully paid, and the Insurance Commissioner shall revoke the license


or certificate of authority granted to the agent or agents of that


company to transact business in this state. Provided, that when any


such insurance company, copartnership, insurance association,


interinsurance exchange, person, insurer, or nonprofit hospital


service and indemnity corporation applies for the first time for a


license to do business in this state, it shall, at the time of


making such application, pay a license fee as prescribed by Section


1435.23 of this title, and, on or before the first day of March,


following, pay the premium tax, membership, application, policy,


registration, and agent appointment fees, as hereinbefore provided.


Such license fee, tax and membership, application, policy,


registration, and appointment fees shall be in lieu of all other


state taxes or fees, except those taxes and fees provided for in the


Oklahoma Insurance Code, and the taxes and fees of any subdivision


or municipality of the state, except ad valorem taxes and the tax


required to be paid pursuant to Section 50001 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. Any health maintenance organization failing to file premium


tax returns and payments promptly and correctly shall forfeit and


pay to the Insurance Commissioner, in addition to the amount of the

Req. No. 2461 Page 6


taxes, the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or an amount equal


to one percent (1%) of the unpaid amount, whichever is greater. Any


health maintenance organization failing or neglecting to pay the tax


and penalty shall be debarred from operating in this state and the


Insurance Commissioner shall revoke the license of the health


maintenance organization, until such taxes and penalties are fully


paid.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 625.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 625.1. A. A Until June 30, 2026, a foreign or alien


insurer which is subject to the tax imposed by Section 624 of this


title shall be entitled to a credit against said such tax actually


paid to and placed in the General Revenue Fund of the state, not


including any of said such tax monies placed in pension funds and


not including any of said such tax monies placed in escrow, if,


during the year for which the tax is being assessed, the insurer or


its affiliate maintained a regional home office in this state in a


building owned or leased by the insurer. To receive a credit


against the tax imposed for the year in which the regional home


office was established, said the office must have been maintained


continuously from on or before August 1 of that year through the


last day of the calendar year. For succeeding years, an insurer or


its affiliate shall have maintained the regional home office


continuously from the first day of the calendar year for which the

Req. No. 2461 Page 7


tax is imposed through the last day of that calendar year. The Home


Office Credit shall be calculated as follows:


1. Until June 30, 2010, the credit shall be equal to the


following percentages of the amount due after the credits authorized


by Sections 624.1 and 625 of this title have been deducted:


a. fifteen percent (15%), if there are more than two


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than three hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees,


b. twenty-five percent (25%), if there are more than


three hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, but less than four hundred full-time, year-


round Oklahoma employees,


c. thirty-five percent (35%), if there are more than four


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than five hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, or


d. fifty percent (50%), if there are five hundred or more


full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees; and


2. Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2026, in the


calculation of the credit, the amount to be apportioned to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund shall be applied prior to the

Req. No. 2461 Page 8


calculation of the credit. The amount of the credit shall be


derived from amounts remaining after the apportionment to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund. The credit shall be calculated by


first applying a “Home Office Credit Allotment Rate” of forty-seven


percent (47%) to the gross premium tax owed by the insurer and then


determining the allowable credit by applying the following


percentages of the amount due after the credits authorized by


Sections 624.1 and 625 of this title have been deducted:


a. fifteen percent (15%), if there are more than two


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than three hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees,


b. twenty-five percent (25%), if there are more than


three hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, but less than four hundred full-time, year-


round Oklahoma employees,


c. thirty-five percent (35%), if there are more than four


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than five hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, or


d. fifty percent (50%), if there are five hundred or more


full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees.

Req. No. 2461 Page 9


B. A Until June 30, 2026, a domestic insurer with four hundred


or more full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees which is subject to


the tax imposed by Section 624 of this title shall be entitled to a


credit against said such tax actually paid to and placed in the


General Revenue Fund of the state, not including any of said such


tax monies placed in pension funds and not including any of said


such tax monies placed in escrow, if, during the year previous to


the year for which the tax is being assessed, the insurer or its


affiliate maintained a regional home office in this state in a


building owned or leased by the insurer and during the year for


which the tax is being assessed, the insurer establishes its home


office in this state in a building owned or leased by the insurer.


To receive a credit against the tax imposed for the year in which


the home office was established, said the office must have been


maintained continuously from on or before August 1 of that year


through the last day of the calendar year. For succeeding years, an


insurer shall have maintained the home office continuously from the


first day of the calendar year for which the tax is imposed through


the last day of that calendar year. Insurers who take action before


August 1, 2000, to establish their home office in this state shall


be entitled to a credit against the tax imposed on or after January


1, 2001, which shall be in addition to the credit the insurer is


entitled to for that year. The Home Office Credit shall be


calculated as follows:

Req. No. 2461 Page 10


1. Until June 30, 2010, the credit shall be equal to the


following percentages of the amount due after the credits authorized


by Sections 624.1 and 625 of this title have been deducted:


a. thirty-five percent (35%), if there are more than four


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than five hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, or


b. fifty percent (50%), if there are five hundred or more


full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees; and


2. Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2026, in the


calculation of the credit, the amount to be apportioned to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund shall be applied prior to the


calculation of the credit. The amount of the credit shall be


derived from amounts remaining after the apportionment to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund. The credit shall be calculated by


first applying a “Home Office Credit Allotment Rate” of forty-seven


percent (47%) to the gross premium tax owed by the insurer and then


determining the allowable credit by applying the following


percentages of the amount due after the credits authorized by


Sections 624.1 and 625 of this title have been deducted:

Req. No. 2461 Page 11


a. thirty-five percent (35%), if there are more than four


hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees, but


less than five hundred full-time, year-round Oklahoma


employees, or


b. fifty percent (50%), if there are five hundred or more


full-time, year-round Oklahoma employees.


C. A Until June 30, 2026, a domestic insurer which is subject


to the tax imposed by Section 624 of this title shall be entitled to


a credit against said such tax actually paid to and placed in the


General Revenue Fund of the state, not including any of said such


tax monies placed in pension funds and not including any of said


such tax monies placed in escrow, if, during the year for which the


tax is being assessed, the insurer maintained a regional home office


in at least five or more counties in this state in buildings owned


or leased by the insurer. To receive a credit against the tax


imposed for the year in which the regional home offices were


established, said the offices must have been maintained continuously


from on or before August 1 of that year through the last day of the


calendar year. For succeeding years, an insurer shall have


maintained the regional home offices continuously from the first day


of the calendar year for which the tax is imposed through the last


day of that calendar year. The Home Office Credit shall be


calculated as follows:



Req. No. 2461 Page 12


1. Until June 30, 2010, the credit shall be equal to the


percentage of the amount due after the credits authorized by


Sections 624.1 and 625 of this title have been deducted as


established in subsection A of this section; and


2. Beginning July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2026, in the


calculation of the credit, the amount to be apportioned to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund shall be applied prior to the


calculation of the credit. The amount of the credit shall be


derived from amounts remaining after the apportionment to the


Oklahoma Firefighters Pension and Retirement Fund, the Oklahoma


Police Pension and Retirement System and the Oklahoma Law


Enforcement Retirement Fund. The credit shall be calculated by


first applying a “Home Office Credit Allotment Rate” of forty-seven


percent (47%) to the gross premium tax owed by the insurer and then


determining the allowable credit by applying the percentage of the


amount due after the credits authorized by Sections 624.1 and 625 of


this title have been deducted as established in subsection A of this


section.


D. Proof that an insurer qualifies for the credit authorized by


this section shall be on forms prescribed by the Insurance


Commissioner and shall be submitted to the Commissioner annually



Req. No. 2461 Page 13


with the report which is filed pursuant to Section 624 of the


Oklahoma Insurance Code.


E. The credit provided for in subsections A, B and C of this


section shall be based on the total number of Oklahoma employees in


the regional or home office when a group of insurers which are under


common management and control maintain a regional home office or


home office in this state in a building owned or leased by the group


of insurers. The credit provided for in subsections A, B and C of


this section may be allocated among the insurance company and the


insurance company affiliates at the discretion of the insurance


company on a per-insurance-company basis.


F. As used in this section:


1. “Regional home office” means an office transacting


insurance, as defined in Section 105 of this title, and performing


insurance company operations, which is defined as one or more or any


combination of the following functions and services performed in


connection with the development, sale, and administration of


products giving rise to receipts subject to a premium tax on


domestic and foreign insurance companies, or domestic or foreign


health care insurance corporations: actuarial, medical, legal,


investments, accounting, auditing, underwriting, policy issuance,


information, policyholder services, premium collection, claims,


advertising and publications, public relations, human resources,


marketing, sales office staff, training of sales and service

Req. No. 2461 Page 14


personnel, and clerical, managerial, and other support for any such


functions or services;


2. “Common management and control” means the possession, direct


or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the


management and policies of an insurer, whether through the ownership


of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise, unless the power is


executed by a person acting in an official capacity, performing


duties imposed and exercising authority granted because of the


person’s position as an officer or employee of the insurer. Control


shall be presumed to exist if any person, directly or indirectly,


owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, or holds proxies


representing twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the voting


securities of the insurer;


3. “Oklahoma employees” means persons who are employed in


Oklahoma after January 1, 2000, and who are common law employees of


an insurance company or its affiliate. Oklahoma employees do not


include independent contractors or any persons to the extent that


the compensation of that person is based on commissions;


4. “Insurance company” means any entity subject to a premium


tax on domestic and foreign insurance companies, or domestic or


foreign health care insurance corporations, including the attorney-


in-fact authorized by and acting for the subscribers of a reciprocal


insurer or inter-insurance interinsurance exchange under powers of



Req. No. 2461 Page 15


attorney. A reciprocal insurer and its attorney-in-fact shall be a


single entity; and


5. “Home office” means the executive offices of an insurance


company which is domiciled in this state.


G. Each insurer or insurance group requesting a credit under


this section shall certify by affidavit, approved as to form by the


Commissioner, that the insurer has met all of the qualifications


required by this section and is authorized to a credit against the


premium tax which actually shall be paid to, and placed in the


General Revenue Fund of, the state, exclusive of any amounts of the


tax which shall be credited to pension funds pursuant to law and


exclusive of any amounts which shall be placed into escrow. The


Commissioner may do an examination for the sole purpose of


certifying that all requirements of this section are being met by


the insurer requesting to obtain any credits against premium tax.


H. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2006, and for each


fiscal year thereafter years 2007 through 2026, and notwithstanding


any other provisions of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title


or any other provision of law governing the order in which the


credit authorized by this section is to be deducted from the


liability of the company claiming such credit to the contrary, the


credit authorized by this section shall be deducted from the


insurance premium tax liability of the company claiming such credit



Req. No. 2461 Page 16


prior to the deduction of any other credits that may be claimed


against such liability.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 2204, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2204. A. A medical professional liability trust shall


file the following items with the Commissioner:


1. Within forty-five (45) days after the end of each of the


first three quarterly periods of each fiscal year, a statement of


the assets and liabilities of the trust as of the end of the


quarterly period, a statement of the revenue and expenditures of the


trust, and a statement of the changes in corpus of the trust for the


period, in each case accompanied by a certificate to the effect that


the statements were prepared from the official books and records of


the trust;


2. Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, a


statement of the assets and liabilities of the trust as of the end


of that year, a statement of the revenue and expenditures of the


trust, and a statement of the changes in corpus of the trust for


that year, in each case accompanied by a certificate signed by a


firm of independent certified public accountants indicating that the


firm has conducted an audit of those statements in accordance with


generally accepted auditing standards and indicating the results of


the audit;



Req. No. 2461 Page 17


3. The independently audited annual financial statement of the


trust by June 1 of each year;


4. The closed claim reports as are required pursuant to


Sections 6810 through 6816 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title;


5. Rates and forms within thirty (30) days after issuance of


the first policy and within thirty (30) days after any changes to


the previously filed rates and forms; and


6. Any amendment to the trust instrument within thirty (30)


days of making the amendment.


B. A trust shall, annually, on or before the first day of


March, report under oath to the Insurance Commissioner, the total


amount of direct written consideration received from the membership


during the preceding calendar year, or since the last return of such


considerations was made by such trust.


1. A trust shall pay to the Insurance Department, on or before


March 1, an annual tax on all direct written considerations, after


all returned considerations are deducted for the privileges of


having written, continued and/or serviced contracts of indemnity


except considerations paid by any governmental agency or


instrumentality. The rate of taxation shall be two and twenty-five


one-hundredths percent (2.25%), until June 30, 2026, and one and


ninety-six one-hundredths percent (1.96%), beginning July 1, 2026.


If any trust fails to remit such taxes in a timely manner, it shall

Req. No. 2461 Page 18


remain liable therefor together with interest thereon at an annual


rate equal to the average United States Treasury Bill rate of the


preceding calendar year as certified by the State Treasurer on the


first regular business day in January of each year, plus four (4)


percentage points.


2. For any trust taxed pursuant to this section, the annual tax


shall be in lieu of all other state taxes or fees, except the taxes


and fees of any subdivision or municipality of the state and except


ad valorem taxes. Any trust failing to make such returns and


payments promptly and correctly shall forfeit and pay to the


Commissioner, in addition to the amount of said such taxes and fees


and interest, the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or an amount


equal to one percent (1%) of the unpaid amount, whichever is


greater; and the trust so failing or neglecting for sixty (60) days


shall thereafter be debarred from transacting any business in this


state until said such taxes, fees and penalties are fully paid.


3. All taxes, fees and penalties collected under this section


shall be reported and disbursed by the Commissioner and appropriated


pursuant to the provisions of Section 312.1 of Title 36 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 2461 Page 19


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2461 QD 12/31/2025 12:05:34 AM









































Req. No. 2461 Page 20